src/fst/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON n_11_A0_A2I_pl !!= * @CODE@ kuva - kuvissa, poika - pojissa ! TODO which adjectives?
+N+Dial/Por :^Por             x_11_A0_A2I_pl ;
+N+Dial/Var :^Var             x_11_A0_A2I_pl ;
+N+Dial/Jok :^Jok             x_11_A0_A2I_pl ;

LEXICON x_11_A0_A2I_pl !!= * @CODE@ kuva - kuvissa, poika - pojissa ! TODO which adjectives?
+Pl         :^WG              nom_t           ;
+Pl+Dial/Por:^A2I%>i2         gen_n           ; ! gen_n         since we have the i
+Pl+Dial/Jok:^WG^A0^I0%>i2    gen_tten        ; ! toolitten. Dialect ! longgenpl, eira 5322, korpus.
+Pl+Dial/Var:^WG^A0^I0%>i2    gen_tten        ; ! toolitten. Dialect ! longgenpl, eira 5322, korpus.
+Pl+Dial/Por:^A2I%>i2         par_end         ; ! for this and gen, add A2I to 0:v context
+Pl+Dial/Jok:^A0^I0%>i2       par_A           ;
+Pl+Dial/Var:^A0^I0%>i2       par_A           ;
+Pl         :^A0^HMETA        ill_hiin        ; ! kuvhiin
+Pl+Dial/Por:^A0%>i2          ess_nA          ;
+Pl+Dial/Jok:^A0^I0%>i2       ess_nA          ; ! no a:o
+Pl+Dial/Var:^A0^I0%>i2       ess_nA          ; ! no a:o
+Pl+Dial/Por:^A0%>i2          com_ne          ;
+Pl+Dial/Jok:^A0^I0%>i2       com_ne          ;
+Pl+Dial/Var:^A0^I0%>i2       com_ne          ;
+Pl+Dial/Por:^WG^A0%>i2       sgpl_cases_even ; !the same affix in sg and pl
+Pl+Dial/Jok:^WG^A0^I0%>i2    sgpl_cases_even ; !TODO ^A0 so that i2 (plural) is consistent (not a:i here)
+Pl+Dial/Var:^WG^A0^I0%>i2    sgpl_cases_even ; !TODO ^A0 so that i2 (plural) is consistent (not a:i here)

LEXICON n_11_saame
+N             :             x_11_saame     ;
+N+Sg          :             nom_R           ;
+N+Sg          :             nom_end         ;

LEXICON x_11_saame 
  +Sg: nom_end ;  
  x_11_saame_i_oblique ; 

LEXICON x_11_saame_i_oblique
  +Sg+Dial/Por:^Por^WG      gen_n_sg         ;
  +Sg+Dial/Jok:^Jok^WG      gen_n_sg         ;
  +Sg+Dial/Var:^Var^WG      gen_n_sg         ;
  +Sg+Dial/Por:             par_V           ;
  +Sg+Dial/Jok:             par_A           ;
  +Sg+Dial/Var:             par_A           ;
  +Sg          :^HMETA       ill_hVVn        ;
  +Sg          :             ess_nA          ;
  +Sg+Dial/Por:^Por^WG      sgpl_cases_even_Por ;
  +Sg+Dial/Jok:^Jok^WG      sgpl_cases_even ;
  +Sg+Dial/Var:^Var^WG      sgpl_cases_even ;

  +Pl          :^WG          nom_t           ;
  +Pl+Dial/Por :%>i2         gen_Vn          ; ! hyksiin
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:^WG%>i2      gen_tten        ; ! hyksitten
  +Pl+Dial/Var:^WG%>i2      gen_tten        ; ! hyksitten
  +Pl+Dial/Por :%>i2         par_V           ; ! hyksii
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:%>i2         par_A           ; ! hyksiä
  +Pl+Dial/Var:%>i2         par_A           ; ! hyksiä
  +Pl          :^EDEL        ill_hiin        ; ! TODO add Twolc description about EDEL ! suomhiin
  +Pl          :%>i2         ess_nA          ;
  +Pl          :%>i2         com_ne          ;
  +Pl          :^WG%>i2      sgpl_cases_even ; !! the same affix in sg and pl
  !      +Pl+Ill:^EDEL%>hii n_PxK         ; ! TODO add Twolc description about EDEL ! suomhiin

LEXICON n_11_i ! pappi, tooli, lyhyt vokali, loppuu i:llä
+N             :             x_11_i     ;
+N+Sg          :             nom_R           ;
+N+Sg          :             nom_end         ;

LEXICON x_11_i ! pappi, tooli, lyhyt vokali, loppuu i:llä
  +Sg: nom_end ;   ! nom.sg in -i (but not propernouns -C)
  x_11_i_oblique ; ! (also for propernouns)

LEXICON x_11_i_oblique ! rest of i, also propernouns
  +Sg+Dial/Por:^Por^WG      gen_n_sg         ;
  +Sg+Dial/Jok:^Jok^WG      gen_n_sg         ;
  +Sg+Dial/Var:^Var^WG      gen_n_sg         ;
  +Sg+Dial/Por:             par_V           ;
  +Sg+Dial/Jok:             par_A           ;
  +Sg+Dial/Var:             par_A           ;
  +Sg          :^HMETA       ill_hVVn        ;
  +Sg          :             ess_nA          ;
  +Sg+Dial/Por:^Por^WG      sgpl_cases_even_Por ;
  +Sg+Dial/Jok:^Jok^WG      sgpl_cases_even ;
  +Sg+Dial/Var:^Var^WG      sgpl_cases_even ;
  
  +Pl+Dial/Por:^Por^WG      nom_t           ;
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:^Jok^WG      nom_t           ;
  +Pl+Dial/Var:^Var^WG      nom_t           ;
  +Pl+Dial/Por :^AO%>i2      gen_n           ; ! gen_n         since we have the i
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:^WG^AO       gen_tten        ;
  +Pl+Dial/Var:^WG^AO       gen_tten        ;
  +Pl+Dial/Por :^AO%>i2      par_end         ;
!  +Pl+Dial/Var:^AO%>j       par_A           ; ! Use i:j in twolc j, see below
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:^AO          par_A           ;
  +Pl+Dial/Var:^AO          par_A           ;
  +Pl          :^AO^HMETA    ill_hVin        ;
  +Pl+Dial/Por :^AO%>i2      ess_nA          ;
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:^AO          ess_nA          ;
  +Pl+Dial/Var:^AO          ess_nA          ;
  +Pl+Dial/Por :^AO%>i2      com_ne          ;
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:^AO          com_ne          ;
  +Pl+Dial/Var:^AO          com_ne          ;
  +Pl+Dial/Por:^Por^WG^AO%>i2   sgpl_cases_even_Por ; !the same affix in sg and pl
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:^Jok^WG^AO       sgpl_cases_even ; ! TODO should be i in other, but not in pappi, tooli, i-ending, also for adjectives in Var, siisti.
  +Pl+Dial/Var:^Var^WG^AO       sgpl_cases_even ; ! TODO should be i in other, but not in pappi, tooli, i-ending, also for adjectives in Var, siisti.

LEXICON n_11_E2I        !!= @CODE@ on ovi:ove, joki:joke, hyksi, suomi ! Ei lainasanat
+N+Dial/Por    :^Por         x_11_E2I  ;
+N+Dial/Var    :^Var         x_11_E2I  ;
+N+Dial/Jok    :^Jok         x_11_E2I  ;
+N+Sg          :^E2I         nom_R           ; ! ^EI e to i
!+N+Dial/Var:^¤   x_11_E2I ; TODO for joen VAR, needs to not break other stuff

LEXICON x_11_E2I
  +Sg+Nom      :^E2I         K               ; ! ^EI e to i
  +Sg          :^WG          gen_n_sg        ;
  +Sg+Dial/Por:             par_V           ; ! suomee
  +Sg+Dial/Jok:^E2I         par_A           ; ! suomea
  +Sg+Dial/Var:^E2I         par_A           ; ! suomea
  +Sg          :^HMETA       ill_hVVn        ; ! tyvheen
  +Sg          :             ess_nA          ;
  +Sg          :^WG          sgpl_cases_even ; !! these two lexica for cases with

  +Pl          :^WG          nom_t           ;
  +Pl+Dial/Por :%>i2         gen_Vn          ; ! hyksiin
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:^WG%>i2      gen_tten        ; ! hyksitten
  +Pl+Dial/Var:^WG%>i2      gen_tten        ; ! hyksitten
  +Pl+Dial/Por :%>i2         par_V           ; ! hyksii
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:%>i2         par_A           ; ! hyksiä
  +Pl+Dial/Var:%>i2         par_A           ; ! hyksiä
  +Pl          :^EDEL        ill_hiin        ; ! TODO add Twolc description about EDEL ! suomhiin
  +Pl          :%>i2         ess_nA          ;
  +Pl          :%>i2         com_ne          ;
  +Pl          :^WG%>i2      sgpl_cases_even ; !! the same affix in sg and pl
  !      +Pl+Ill:^EDEL%>hii n_PxK         ; ! TODO add Twolc description about EDEL ! suomhiin
