src/fst/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounRoot !!= @CODE@
Kallanpojat:Kallan#poi6ka n_11_A0_A2I_pl ;
munat:muna n_11_A0_A2I_pl ;
klinkkuveitti:klinkku#veitt2e n_11_E2I ;
louhi:louhe n_11_E2I ;
pikkuveli:pikku#velje n_11_E2I ;
kväänireki:kvääni#reke n_11_E2I ;
reki:reke n_11_E2I ;
solki:solke n_11_E2I ;
joulukylki:joulu#kylke n_11_E2I ;
kylki:kylke n_11_E2I ;
jalanjälki:jalan#jälke n_11_E2I ;
telki:telke n_11_E2I ;
juhlahenki:juhla#henke n_11_E2I ;
privaattihenki:privaatti#henke n_11_E2I ;
tuulenhenki:tuulen#henke n_11_E2I ;
höyhenonki:höyhen#onke n_11_E2I ;
onki:onke n_11_E2I ;
valtajoki:valta#joke n_11_E2I ;
noki:noke n_11_E2I ;
kurki:kurke n_11_E2I ;
keskikärki:keski#kärke n_11_E2I ;
kaski:kaske n_11_E2I ;
koski:koske n_11_E2I ;
kuski:kuske n_11_E2I ;
malariasääski:malaria#sääske n_11_E2I ;
sääski:sääske n_11_E2I ;
hetki:hetke n_11_E2I ;
hauki:hauke n_11_E2I ;
mäki:mäke n_11_E2I ;
kranniväki:kranni#väke n_11_E2I ;
majoriteettiväki:majoriteetti#väke n_11_E2I ;
herraväki:herra#väke n_11_E2I ;
sotaväki:sota#väke n_11_E2I ;
kirkkoväki:kirkko#väke n_11_E2I ;
vaimoväki:vaimo#väke n_11_E2I ;
pikkuväki:pikku#väke n_11_E2I ;
työväki:työ#väke n_11_E2I ;
paikalisväki:paikalis#väke n_11_E2I ;
väki:väke n_11_E2I ;
tuki:tuke n_11_E2I ;
luulajansaame:luulajan#saame n_11_saame ;
eteläsaame:etelä#saame n_11_saame ;
koltansaame:koltan#saame n_11_saame ;
pohjaissaame:pohjais#saame n_11_saame ;
piitimensaame:piitimen#saame n_11_saame ;
uumajansaame:uumajan#saame n_11_saame ;
inarinsaame:inarin#saame n_11_saame ;
kolttasaame:koltta#saame n_11_saame ;
öystäsaame:öystä#saame n_11_saame ;
saame:saame n_11_saame ;
SoMe:SoMe n_11_saame ;
niemi:nieme n_11_E2I ;
matrikkelinimi:matrikkeli#nime n_11_E2I ;
haukkumanimi:haukkuma#nime n_11_E2I ;
kunnianimi:kunnia#nime n_11_E2I ;
etunimi:etu#nime n_11_E2I ;
ristimänimi:ristimä#nime n_11_E2I ;
pittääjännimi:pittääjä#nime n_11_E2I ;
soimi:soime n_11_E2I ;
helmi:helme n_11_E2I ;
luomi:luome n_11_E2I ;
paskasuomi:paska#suome n_11_E2I ;
tornionlaksonsuomi:tornionlakson#suome n_11_E2I ;
ylheissuomi:ylheis#suome n_11_E2I ;
tuomi:tuome n_11_E2I ;
pikkusormi:pikku#sorme n_11_E2I ;
sormi:sorme n_11_E2I ;
nurmi:nurme n_11_E2I ;
onni:onne n_11_E2I ;
kilpi:kilpe n_11_E2I ;
saksi:sakse n_11_E2I ;
haavanlehti:haavan#lehte n_11_E2I ;
iltatähti:ilta#tähte n_11_E2I ;
poptähti:pop#tähte n_11_E2I ;
prykte:prykte n_11_saame ;
nisse:nisse n_11_saame ;
savi:save n_11_E2I ;
merkkikivi:merkki#kive n_11_E2I ;
uhrikivi:uhri#kive n_11_E2I ;
villirahtukivi:villirahtu#kive n_11_E2I ;
keskitalvi:keski#talve n_11_E2I ;
ruffelipilvi:ruffeli#pilve n_11_E2I ;
jälkipolvi:jälki#polve n_11_E2I ;
ulko-ovi:ulko-#ove n_11_E2I ;
poovi:poove n_11_E2I ;
lehmänsarvi:lehmän#sarve n_11_E2I ;
torvi:torve n_11_E2I ;
järvi:järve n_11_E2I ;
touvi:touve n_11_E2I ;
tooki:took2i n_11_i ;
maanpruuki:maan#pruuk2i n_11_i ;
katukööki:katu#köök2i n_11_i ;
teefati:tee#fat2i n_11_i ;
ruotti:ruott2i n_11_i ;
laajaidrettiklubi:laajaidretti#klubi n_11_i ;
kattilakaffi+Err/Orth:kattila#kahvi n_11_i ;
slanki:slank2i n_11_i ;
kiljuhanhi:kilju#hanhi n_11_i ;
isoäiji:iso#äiji n_11_i ;
sporttilaaki:sportti#laak2i n_11_i ;
jäälaki+Hom2:jää#lake n_11_E2I ;
täkkäyslaki+Hom1:täkkäys#laki n_11_i ;
piki:pike n_11_E2I ;
knuppilakki:knuppi#lakki n_11_i ;
liekki:liekki n_11_i ;
lenkki:lenkki n_11_i ;
kukkaispenkki:kukkais#penkki n_11_i ;
punkki:punkki n_11_i ;
nasunaaliparkki:nasunaali#parkki n_11_i ;
puumerkki:puu#merkki n_11_i ;
peukalonpukki:peukalon#pukki n_11_i ;
hämmähäkki:hämmähäkki n_11_i ;
karttavärkki:kartta#värkki n_11_i ;
vaski:vaski n_11_i ;
kiiski:kiiske n_11_E2I ;
fläski:fläski n_11_i ;
maali:maali n_11_i ;
testikkeli:testikkeli n_11_i ;
isoseili:iso#seili n_11_i ;
ryssepiili:rysse#piili n_11_i ;
hallittemismalli:hallittemis#malli n_11_i ;
maitovelli:maito#velli n_11_i ;
silli:silli n_11_i ;
ställi:ställi n_11_i ;
trooli:trooli n_11_i ;
regi:regi n_11_i ;
raami:raami n_11_i ;
umpisolmi:umpi#solme n_11_E2I ;
yhtheiskammi:yhtheis#kammi n_11_i ;
armi:armi n_11_i ;
tuumi:tuumi n_11_i ;
sonni:sonni n_11_i ;
kirkontoorni:kirkon#toorni n_11_i ;
käsifuuni:käsi#fuuni n_11_i ;
jääkräämi:jää#kräämi n_11_i ;
lampi:lampe n_11_E2I ;
hoppeeteippi:hoppee#teippi n_11_i ;
pappi:pappi n_11_i ; ! vartalo = pappi, heikko vartalo = papi
svamppi:svamppi n_11_i ;
korppi:korppi n_11_i ;
paskakläppi:paska#kläppi n_11_i ;
putaattilaari:putaatti#laari n_11_i ;
sivakkapari:sivakka#pari n_11_i ;
kori:kori n_11_i ;
ruokkomuori:ruokkomuori n_11_i ;
sisti:sisti n_11_i ;
sađetrööri:sađet#rööri n_11_i ;
haasi:haasi n_11_i ;
marraskesi:marras#kesi n_11_i ;
rajaluusi:raja#luusi n_11_i ;
drossi:drossi n_11_i ;
käsiprämssi:käsi#prämssi n_11_i ;
dyssi:dyssi n_11_i ;
pausi:pausi n_11_i ;
idrettiraati:idretti#raat2i n_11_i ;
safti:safti n_11_i ;
kläpinvahti:kläpin#vahti n_11_i ;
punkti:punkti n_11_i ;
vapaauinti:vapaa#uinti n_11_i ;
venheenlasti:venheen#lasti n_11_i ;
muisti:muisti n_11_i ;
patruljiposti:patrulji#posti n_11_i ;
apupraatti:apu#praatti n_11_i ;
reitti:reitti n_11_i ;
nuolikyltti:nuoli#kyltti n_11_i ;
yđinkontti:yđin#kontti n_11_i ;
plotti:plotti n_11_i ;
heliportti:heli#portti n_11_i ;
gigabyytti:giga#byytti n_11_i ;
meritauti:meri#tauti n_11_i ;
kruuti:kruut2i n_11_i ;
kravi:kravi n_11_i ;
oivi:oivi n_11_i ;
skruuvi:skruuvi n_11_i ;
puoti:puoti n_11_i ;
